Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d, Veterinarians, §§ 3, 4.

Sec. 08.98.120.
License required; prohibitions; penalty.

A person may not practice veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry unless the person is licensed as a veterinarian under this chapter or has a temporary permit issued under AS

08.98.186

, except that a person may perform functions authorized by

regulation of the board if the person is licensed as a veterinary technician; or

a permit issued under AS

08.02.050

if the person is employed by an agency that has a permit issued under AS

08.02.050

.

A person may not

present or attempt to use a license or permit that was issued under this chapter to another person, either directly or by impersonation;

secure or attempt to secure a license or permit under this chapter through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

use or attempt to use an expired or revoked license or permit knowing of the license’s or permit’s status; or

falsely claim to be licensed or to hold a permit under this chapter.

Violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 7 ch 130 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 128 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary technicians, see 12 AAC 68, art. 4.

Sec. 08.98.125.
Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to the following:

a veterinary medical officer in the military service in the discharge of official duties or as an employee in the federal or state government performing veterinary medical services within the scope of the person’s official duties;

a veterinarian who is licensed in another state or country, or a person whose expertise a veterinarian licensed in this state believes would benefit an animal, and who provides only consultation to a veterinarian licensed in this state; in this paragraph, “consultation” means advice or assistance provided in person, telephonically, electronically, or by any other method of communication from a veterinarian or other person whose expertise, in the opinion of the veterinarian, would benefit the animal; and

a veterinarian licensed and residing in another state who provides assistance, as requested by and under the supervision of a veterinarian licensed in this state, for the purpose of providing skills not otherwise available in this state in conducting research or other practice of veterinary medicine on captive or free-ranging wildlife; however, that assistance is limited to not more than three events in a calendar year for not more than a total of 60 days in the year and may not be on a regular or recurring basis, as defined by the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 108 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.98.130.
Examination. [Repealed, § 16 ch 130 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.98.140.
Content of examination. [Repealed, § 6 ch 5 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 08.98.150.
Administration of examination.

The board shall offer examinations at least once a year. Examinations shall be so administered that, whenever possible, one who grades a written examination does not know the identity of the examinee whose test is being graded.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 4 ch 94 SLA 1966)

Sec. 08.98.160.
Reexamination.

A person who fails an examination may apply for a subsequent examination, but shall pay the examination fee each time the person applies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963)

Sec. 08.98.165.
Qualification for license.

An applicant is qualified to receive a license as a veterinarian who

is a graduate of an accredited veterinary school or who has successfully completed the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates certification process;

has, within the 60 months preceding application for the license, passed a national examination for veterinarians approved by the board;

has passed the written examination of the state on specific Alaska issues of veterinary practice;

is in good standing, as defined by the board in regulations; and

has paid required fees.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 5 SLA 1998.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 128 SLA 1996; am §§ 2, 6 ch 5 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Sec. 08.98.167.
Qualification for technician license.

The board shall adopt regulations under which a person may qualify to be licensed as a veterinary technician.

History.

(§ 5 ch 128 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary technicians, see 12 AAC 68, art. 4.

Sec. 08.98.170.
Qualification for examination. [Repealed, § 16 ch 130 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.98.165.]

Sec. 08.98.180.
Temporary license.

A person who meets the requirements of AS

08.98.165(a)(1)

, (4), and (5) is entitled to be temporarily licensed after applying for examination if the person works under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian. A license issued under this section is valid until the results of the examinations are published. A person may not receive more than one temporary license. An application for a temporary license must be signed by the supervising veterinarian and accompanied by the temporary license fee required under AS

08.98.190

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 7 ch 94 SLA 1966; am § 10 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1981; am § 52 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 5 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Sec. 08.98.184.
Licensure by credentials.

The board shall approve the issuance of a license to an applicant who holds a valid license to practice veterinary medicine in another state, territory, or country if the applicant

has graduated from an accredited school of veterinary medicine or has successfully completed the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates certification process;

has been engaged in the active practice of veterinary medicine for at least five of the seven years before filing the application;

has passed the written examination of the state on specific Alaska issues of veterinary practice;

is in good standing, as defined by the board in regulations; and

has paid required fees.

History.

(§ 11 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 128 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 5 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Sec. 08.98.186.
Temporary permit.

A person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in another state who meets the requirements of AS

08.98.165(a)(1)

, (4), and (5) may be granted a temporary permit to conduct the practice of a person licensed in the state who is absent from practice. An application shall be signed by the person who is or will be absent from practice and by the applicant. A temporary permit is valid for no longer than 60 days after issuance but may be renewed.

History.

(§ 11 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 5 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy license, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Sec. 08.98.188.
Student permit.

The board may approve the issuance of a student permit to a student enrolled in and in good standing at an accredited college of veterinary medicine who has completed three years of study and is participating in an externship program as part of the college’s educational curriculum.

A student permit is valid for not longer than one year and may not extend beyond the student’s graduation.

A holder of a student permit is subject to the following limitations:

assistance in diagnosis and surgery must be under the immediate supervision of a veterinarian licensed in this state;

assistance in treatment must be under the direct or indirect supervision of a veterinarian licensed in this state;

not more than one student permit holder at a time may be under the direct supervision of a veterinarian licensed in this state; and

a veterinary practice may not retain more than two student permit holders at a time.

The board shall establish requirements for student permits by regulation.

A person holding a permit under this section is not subject to provisions of this chapter other than this section.

In this section,

“direct supervision” means the supervising veterinarian is on the premises where the animal is being treated and is quickly and easily available;

“immediate supervision” means the supervising veterinarian is in the immediate area and within audible and visual range of the animal patient and the person treating the patient;

“indirect supervision” means the supervising veterinarian does not need to be on the premises but has given either written or oral instructions for the treatment of the animal;

“veterinary practice” means a business that provides veterinary services.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.98.190.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for the following:

application;

examination;

investigation of credentials;

license;

license renewal;

temporary license;

temporary permit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 1968; am § 12 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 53 ch 37 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Sec. 08.98.200.
Reinstatement of lapsed license.

A person whose license has lapsed is entitled to have the license reinstated without taking an examination unless the license has remained lapsed more than five years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 53 SLA 1968)

Administrative Code. —

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Sec. 08.98.210.
Out-of-state veterinarian. [Repealed, § 16 ch 130 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.98.184 and 08.98.186.]